Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 273.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 24. new text end new text begin Limited residential market value. new text end new text begin (a) In the case of all property classified as agricultural homestead or nonhomestead and residential homestead or nonhomestead, the assessor shall compare the value with the taxable portion of the value determined in the preceding assessment. For assessment year 2025 and thereafter, the amount of the increase shall not exceed two percent of the value in the preceding assessment. new text end new text begin (b) When property in paragraph (a) is sold, a county assessor may reassess the residential property at the current fair market value for the property. new text end new text begin (c) The limitation in paragraph (a) shall not apply to increases in value due to improvements. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for assessment year 2025 and thereafter. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 275.08, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Residential property tax adjustment. new text end new text begin Before the county auditor spreads the taxes, when calculating the net tax capacity and local tax rates, the county auditor shall adjust the amounts for parcels classified as agricultural homestead, agricultural nonhomestead, residential homestead, and residential nonhomestead so that the property tax for each parcel is limited to one percent of the current year assessment value for each parcel. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for property taxes payable in 2026 and thereafter. new text end